Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2008.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. Public school libraries; professional associations; prohibition; definition A. A school library that is operated by a public school in this state may not use any public monies to pay any professional association that is dedicated to promoting, supporting and advocating for libraries, librarians and information services. B. This section does not prohibit a county free library district, municipal library or other entity with which a public school may enter a contract or agreement for library services, books or programs, including contracts and agreements executed pursuant to section 15-362, from paying dues to or becoming an organizational member of a professional association described in subsection A of this section. C. For the purposes of this section, "school library" includes the library of a school, each school site that is served by the library and the school governing body. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Library Freedom Act".